en: Needle threader compatible needle type: Beading needles; Chenille needles; Darning needles; Embroidery needles; Hand-sewing needles; Overlock/serger needles; Quilting needles; Sewing machine needles; Tapestry/yarn needles; Universal (multiple needle types); Other
tr: İğne iplik geçirici ile uyumlu iğne tipi: Boncuk iğneleri; Şönil iğneleri; Yama iğneleri; Nakış iğneleri; El dikişi iğneleri; Overlok iğneleri; Kapitone iğneleri; Dikiş makinesi iğneleri; Goblen/yün iğneleri; Evrensel (çoklu iğne tipleri); Diğer
lt-LT: Adatos įvėriklio suderinamas adatos tipas: Karoliukų vėrimo adatos; Šenilinės adatos; Adymo adatos; Siuvinėjimo adatos; Rankinio siuvimo adatos; Overloko adatos; Daigstymo adatos; Siuvimo mašinų adatos; Gobeleno / verpalų adatos; Universalu (kelių tipų adatos); Kita
bg-BG: Съвместим тип игла за вдявач на конец: Игли за мъниста; Игли за шенил; Игли за кърпене; Игли за бродерия; Игли за ръчно шиене; Игли за оверлог; Игли за куилтинг; Игли за шевна машина; Игли за гоблен/прежда; Универсални (множество видове игли); Друго
es: Tipo de aguja compatible con el enhebrador: Agujas para abalorios; Agujas de chenilla; Agujas de zurcir; Agujas de bordar; Agujas para coser a mano; Agujas de overlock o remalladora; Agujas de acolchar; Agujas para máquina de coser; Agujas para tapicería/lana; Universal (múltiples tipos de agujas); Otro
fi: Neulan langoittajaan sopiva neulatyyppi: Helmityöneulat; Kanavaneulat; Parsinneulat; Kirjontaneulat; Käsinompeluneulat; Saumurien neulat; Tikkausneulat; Ompelukoneen neulat; Kanavaneulat / lankaneulat; Yleiskäyttöiset (useita neulatyyppejä); Muu
da: Kompatibel nåletype for nåletråder: Perlenåle; Chenillenåle; Stoppenåle; Broderinåle; Håndsynåle; Overlockernåle; Quiltenåle; Symaskinenåle; Gobelin-/garnnåle; Universal (flere nåletyper); Andet
th: เข็มชนิดที่ใช้ร่วมกับอุปกรณ์สนเข็มได้: เข็มร้อยลูกปัด; เข็มเชนิลล์; เข็มชุนผ้า; เข็มปักผ้า; เข็มเย็บมือ; เข็มจักรโพ้ง/จักรพันริม; เข็มควิลท์; เข็มเย็บจักร; เข็มแทปเพสทรี/เข็มร้อยไหมพรม; อเนกประสงค์(เข็มหลายประเภท); อื่นๆ
vi: Dụng cụ xỏ chỉ kim, loại kim tương thích.: Kim xỏ cườm; Kim thêu len; Kim mạng; Kim thêu; Kim khâu tay; Kim máy vắt sổ; Kim chần bông; Kim máy may; Kim thêu thảm/kim xỏ len; Đa năng (nhiều loại kim); Khác
nb: Kompatibel nåltype for nålitreder: Perlenåler; Chenillenåler; Stoppenåler; Broderinåler; Håndsømnåler; Overlock-nåler; Quiltenåler; Symaskinnåler; Tapestry- / garnnåler; Universell (flere nåletyper); Annet
hu: Tűbefűzővel kompatibilis tűtípus: Gyöngyfűző tűk; Zsenília tűk; Stoppoló tűk; Hímzőtűk; Kézi varrótűk; Overlock/szegőgép tűk; Foltvarró tűk; Varrógéptűk; Gobelintűk/fonaltűk; Univerzális (több tűtípushoz); Egyéb
ru: Совместимый тип игл для нитевдевателя: Иглы для бисера; Синельные иглы; Штопальные иглы; Иглы для вышивания; Иглы для ручного шитья; Иглы для оверлока; Иглы для квилтинга; Иглы для швейных машин; Гобеленовые иглы/иглы для пряжи; Универсальные (несколько типов игл); Другое
sk-SK: Typ ihly kompatibilný s navliekačom ihiel: Korálkovacie ihly; Ženilkové ihly; Látacie ihly; Vyšívacie ihly; Ihly na ručné šitie; Overlockové ihly; Prešívacie ihly; Ihly do šijacieho stroja; Gobelínové/vlnárske ihly; Univerzálne (viacero typov ihiel); Iné
sl-SI: Vrsta igel, združljivih z vdevalcem sukanca: Igle za nizanje perlic; Ženiljske igle; Igle za krpanje; Igle za vezenje; Igle za ročno šivanje; Igle za overlock/serger; Igle za prešivanje; Igle za šivalne stroje; Igle za tapiserijo/prejo; Univerzalno (več vrst igel); Drugo
fr: Type d’aiguille compatible avec l’enfile-aiguille: Aiguilles à perles; Aiguilles à chenille; Aiguilles à repriser; Aiguilles à broder; Aiguilles à coudre à la main; Aiguilles pour surjeteuse; Aiguilles à quilter; Aiguilles pour machine à coudre; Aiguilles à tapisserie/laine; Universel (plusieurs types d’aiguilles); Autre
pt-PT: tipo de agulha compatível com passador de linha: Agulhas de enfiar missangas; Agulhas de chenille; Agulhas de cerzir; Agulhas de bordar; Agulhas para coser à mão; Agulhas de overlock/corta e cose; Agulhas de acolchoar; Agulhas para máquina de costura; Agulhas de tapeçaria/fio; Universal (vários tipos de agulhas); Outro
sv: Nåltyp kompatibel med nålträdare: Pärlnålar; Chenillenålar; Stoppnålar; Broderinålar; Handsömnadsnålar; Overlocknålar; Quiltnålar; Symaskinsnålar; Tapisserinålar/garnnålar; Universella (flera nåltyper); Övrigt
de: Kompatibler Nadeltyp für den Nadeleinfädler: Perlennadeln; Chenillenadeln; Stopfnadeln; Sticknadeln; Handnähnadeln; Overlock-Nadeln; Quiltnadeln; Nähmaschinennadeln; Gobelin-/Garnnadeln; Universal (mehrere Nadeltypen); Sonstiges
ro-RO: Tip de ac compatibil cu dispozitivul de înfilare a acului: Ace pentru mărgele; Ace pentru chenille; Ace pentru stopat; Ace pentru brodat; Ace pentru cusut manual; Ace pentru surfilat/triplock; Ace pentru matlasat; Ace pentru mașina de cusut; Ace pentru tapiserie/fire; Universal (mai multe tipuri de ace); Altele
nl: Naaldinrijger compatibel naaldtype: Kralennaalden; Chenillenaalden; Stopnaalden; Borduurnaalden; Handnaainaalden; Lockmachinenaalden; Quiltnaalden; Naaimachinenaalden; Tapisserie-/garennaalden; Universeel (meerdere naaldtypes); Anders
pt-BR: Passador de linha tipo de agulha compatível: Agulhas para miçangas; Agulhas de chenille; Agulhas de cerzir; Agulhas de bordado; Agulhas de costura à mão; Agulhas de overloque; Agulhas de quilting; Agulhas para máquina de costura; Agulhas de tapeçaria/fio; Universal (múltiplos tipos de agulhas); Outro
hr-HR: Tip igle kompatibilan s uvlakačem konca: Igle za nizanje perli; Igle za šenil; Igle za štopanje; Igle za vez; Igle za ručno šivanje; Igle za overlock / endlericu; Igle za prošivanje; Igle za šivaći stroj; Igle za tapiseriju / pređu; Univerzalne (više vrsta igala); Ostalo
zh-TW: 穿針器相容針具類型: 串珠針; 雪尼爾針; 織補針; 刺繡針; 手縫針; 拷克機/包縫機專用針; 絎縫針; 車縫針; 掛毯針/毛線針; 通用 (多種針型); 其他
it: Tipo di ago compatibile con l'infila-ago: Aghi per perline; Aghi per ciniglia; Aghi da rammendo; Aghi da ricamo; Aghi per cucito a mano; Aghi per tagliacuci; Aghi per quilting; Aghi per macchina da cucire; Aghi per arazzi/lana; Universale (tipi di ago multipli); Altro
pl: Kompatybilny typ igły nawlekacza: Igły do koralików; Igły szenilowe; Igły do cerowania; Igły do haftu; Igły do szycia ręcznego; Igły do owerloka; Igły do pikowania; Igły do maszyn do szycia; Igły gobelinowe/do włóczki; Uniwersalne (różne typy igieł); Inne
ja: 針糸通し器対応針タイプ: ビーズ針; シェニール針; ダーニング針; 刺繍針; 手縫い針; ロックミシン針; キルティング針; ミシン針; タペストリー/毛糸とじ針; ユニバーサル (複数タイプの針に対応); その他
el: Τύπος βελόνας συμβατός με περαστή κλωστής βελόνας: Βελόνες για χάντρες; Βελόνες για σενίλ; Βελόνες μανταρίσματος; Βελόνες κεντήματος; Βελόνες ραψίματος στο χέρι; Βελόνες κοπτοράπτη/overlock; Βελόνες καπιτονέ; Βελόνες ραπτομηχανής; Βελόνες ταπετσαρίας/νήματος; Γενικής χρήσης (πολλαπλοί τύποι βελόνας); Άλλο
ko: 바늘귀 실 끼우개 호환 바늘 종류: 비딩 바늘; 셔닐 바늘; 다닝 바늘; 자수 바늘; 손바느질 바늘; 오버록/서저 바늘; 퀼팅 바늘; 재봉틀 바늘; 태피스트리/털실 바늘; 유니버설(다중 바늘 유형); 기타
zh-CN: 穿线器适配针型: 串珠针; 雪尼尔针; 织补针; 刺绣针; 手工缝纫针; 拷边机/包缝机针; 绗缝针; 缝纫机针; 挂毯/纱线针; 通用（多种针型）; 其他
cs: Typ jehly kompatibilní s navlékačem nitě: Korálkovací jehly; Žinylkové jehly; Látací jehly; Vyšívací jehly; Jehly pro ruční šití; Overlockové jehly; Prošívací jehly; Jehly do šicího stroje; Gobelínové jehly / jehly na přízi; Univerzální (více typů jehel); Ostatní